Utah statutes.
19-3-103.   Radiation Control Board -- Members -- Organization -- Meetings -- Per diem and expenses.

(1)  The board created under Section 19-1-106 comprises 13 members, one of whom shall be the executive director, or his designee, and the remainder of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(2)  No more than six appointed members shall be from the same political party.

(3)  The appointed members shall be knowledgeable about radiation protection and shall be as follows:

(a)  one physician;

(b)  one dentist;

(c)  one health physicist or other professional employed in the field of radiation safety;

(d)  three representatives of regulated industry, at least one of whom represents the radioactive waste management industry, and at least one of whom represents the uranium milling industry;

(e)  one registrant or licensee representative from academia;

(f)  one representative of a local health department;

(g)  one elected county official; and

(h)  three members of the general public, at least one of whom represents organized environmental interests.

(4) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(b), as terms of current board members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(5)  Each board member is eligible for reappointment to more than one term.

(6)  Each board member shall continue in office until the expiration of his term and until a successor is appointed, but not more than 90 days after the expiration of his term.

(7)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term by the governor, after considering recommendations by the department and with the consent of the Senate.

(8)  The board shall annually elect a chair and vice chair from its members.

(9)  The board shall meet at least quarterly.  Other meetings may be called by the chair, by the executive secretary, or upon the request of three members of the board.

(10)  Reasonable notice shall be given each member of the board prior to any meeting.

(11)  Seven members constitute a quorum.  The action of a majority of the members present is the action of the board.

(12)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

